Maine, session 132, LD404.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §378-B is enacted to read:
§378-B. Lottery winner identity; confidentiality
The identity of a person awarded a prize of $100,000 or more and the identity of a
person who is a participant in the Address Confidentiality Program under Title 5, section
90-B awarded a prize of any amount are confidential unless the person awarded such a
prize provides written authorization to the bureau allowing the disclosure of that person's
identity. The bureau may disclose the identity of the person to another state agency solely
for purposes authorized under state and federal law, and that state agency is prohibited from
further disclosing the person's identity.
Information designated as confidential under this section is not a public record as
defined in Title 1, section 402, subsection 3.
Page 1 - 132LR0947(03)